District of Columbia statutes.
31-3311.07

Public records.

The Commissioner shall, as soon as practicable, make all rate filings, including all supporting documentation, amended filings, and reports filed pursuant to this chapter, available for public inspection either at the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking or on its website.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 108, 58 DCR 896